California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 identified from any other local taxes or other charges that are remitted to the local jurisdiction or local agency imposing the local tax or other charge. The amounts remitted to the local jurisdiction or local agency imposing the local charge pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the respective local jurisdiction or local agency account.

(e) A direct seller shall use the amounts posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) when determining what amounts to remit to each local jurisdiction or local agency.

(f) The amount of the local charges shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services by the seller, or otherwise disclosed electronically to the prepaid consumer, at the time of the retail transaction.

(g) The local charge that is required to be collected by a seller and any amount not returned to the prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services that is not owed as part of the local charge, but was collected from the prepaid consumer under the representation by the seller that it was owed as part of the local charge, constitute debts owed by the seller jointly to this state, for purposes of collection on behalf of, and payment to, the local jurisdiction and to the local jurisdiction imposing that local charge.

(h) A seller that has collected any amount of local charges in excess of the amount imposed by this part and actually due from a prepaid consumer may refund that amount to the prepaid consumer, even though the amount has already been paid over to the department and no corresponding credit or refund has yet been secured. Any seller making a refund of any charge to a prepaid consumer may repay therewith the amount of the
 charges paid.

(i) (1) Every prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services in this state is liable for any local charges until they have been paid to this state, except that payment to a seller registered under this part relieves the prepaid consumer from further liability for the local charges. Any local charge collected from a prepaid consumer that has not been remitted to the department shall be a debt owed jointly to the state, for purposes of collection on behalf of, and payment to, the local jurisdiction and to the local jurisdiction imposing the local charge by the person required to collect and remit the local charge. Nothing in this part shall impose any obligation upon a seller to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the local charge imposed by this section.

(2) A credit shall be allowed against, but shall not exceed, the local charges
 imposed on any prepaid consumer of mobile telephony services by this part to the extent that the prepaid consumer has paid local charges on the purchase to any other state, political subdivision thereof, or the District of Columbia. The credit shall be apportioned to the charges against which it is allowed in proportion to the amounts of those charges.

(j) (1) A seller is relieved from liability to collect the local charges imposed by this part that became due and payable, insofar as the base upon which the charges are imposed is represented by accounts that have been found to be worthless and charged off for income tax purposes by the seller or, if the seller is not required to file income tax returns, charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A seller that has previously paid the charges may, under rules and regulations prescribed by the department, take as a deduction on its return the
 amount found worthless and charged off by the seller. If any of those accounts are thereafter, in whole or in part, collected by the seller, the amount so collected shall be included in the first return filed after its collection and the charges shall be paid with the return.

(2) The department may, by regulation, adopt other rules with respect to uncollected or worthless accounts it deems necessary to the fair and efficient administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 4.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.7.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2017, a seller, other than a direct seller, with de minimis sales of prepaid mobile telephony services of less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) during the previous calendar year is not required to collect local charges pursuant to Section 42101.5. The Department of Finance shall annually review and adjust that de minimis sales threshold as necessary to minimize program administration costs and maintain revenues to support program administration and enforcement activities. Any adjustment of the de minimis sales threshold shall become operative on January 1 of the following calendar year. Nothing in this section prevents a seller from collecting and remitting the surcharge on a voluntary basis even if the seller meets the de minimis sales threshold.

(b) For purposes of this section, the de minimis sales threshold shall be based on the aggregate of all sales of prepaid mobile telephone services subject to the local charges at all retail locations operated by the seller and not the individual sales at each retail location operated by the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 5.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.8.

(a) For purposes of this part, a retail transaction occurs in the state under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The prepaid consumer makes the retail transaction in person at a business location in the state (point-of-sale transaction).

(2) If paragraph (1) is not applicable, the prepaid consumer’s address is in the state (known-address transaction). A known-address transaction occurs in the state under any of the following circumstances:

(A) The retail sale involves shipping of an item to be delivered to, or picked up by, the prepaid consumer at a location in the state.

(B) If the prepaid consumer’s address is known by the seller to be in the state, including if the seller’s records maintained in the ordinary course of business indicate that the prepaid consumer’s address is in the state and the records are not made or kept in bad faith.

(C) The prepaid consumer provides an address during consummation of the retail transaction that is in the state, including an address provided with respect to the payment instrument if no other address is available and the address is not given in bad faith.

(3) If an address is not available to the seller to determine whether any of the circumstances in paragraph (2) exist, the transaction will be deemed to be a known-address transaction occurring in this state if the mobile telephone number is associated with a location in this state.

(b) (1) A retail transaction shall occur at only one location for purposes of determining local charges. If the retail transaction is a point-of-sale transaction, the consumption of, use of, or access to, the prepaid mobile telephony service shall be presumed to be at that location.

(2) If the retail transaction is a known-address transaction, the location shall be as determined in descending order beginning with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a); if subparagraph (A) of that paragraph is inapplicable, then pursuant to subparagraph (B) of that paragraph; if both subparagraphs (A) and (B) of that paragraph are inapplicable, then subparagraph (C) of that paragraph; and if subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of that paragraph are inapplicable, then paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). In a known-address transaction, the consumption of, use of, or access
 to the prepaid mobile telephony service shall be presumed to be at the known address.

(c) (1) A seller that relies in good faith on information provided by the department to match the location of a point-of-sale transaction to the applicable local charges, that collects that amount from the prepaid consumer, and that remits the amount to the department in compliance with this part, shall not be liable for any additional local charges and shall not be required to refund any amounts collected and paid to the department to the prepaid consumer.

(2) For a known-address transaction, the seller may collect the local charges that correspond to the five-digit postal ZIP Code of the prepaid consumer’s address. A seller that, with due diligence and in good faith, relies on credible information to match the five-digit postal ZIP Code of the prepaid consumer’s address to
 the applicable local charges amount, that collects that amount from the prepaid consumer, and that remits the amount to the department in compliance with this part, shall not be liable for any additional local charges and shall not be required to refund any amounts collected and paid to the department to the prepaid consumer, even if the five-digit postal ZIP Code of the prepaid consumer’s address that the seller uses corresponds to more than one local charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 6.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.9.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if prepaid mobile telephony services are sold in combination with mobile data services or any other services or products that are not subject to the local charges for a single price, then the local charges shall apply to the entire price unless the seller can identify the mobile data services and other services or products from its books and records kept in the ordinary course of business.

(b) If prepaid mobile telephony services are sold with a mobile telephone service communication device, commonly termed a cellular telephone, for a single, nonitemized price, then the local charges shall apply to the entire nonitemized price, except if the purchase price for the cellular telephone component
 of the bundled charge is disclosed to the prepaid consumer on a receipt, invoice, or other written or electronic documentation provided to the prepaid consumer, the local charges may be calculated excluding the separately stated price of the cellular telephone.

(c) If a minimal amount of prepaid mobile telephony service is sold for a single, nonitemized price with a mobile telephony service communications device, the seller shall not apply the local charges to the transaction. For these purposes, a service allotment denominated as 10 minutes or less, or five dollars ($5) or less, is a minimal amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 7.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42102.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after January 1, 2016, the authority of a city, county, or city and county, which includes a charter city, county, or city and county, to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid mobile telephony service in the city, county, or city and county at the rate as specified in an ordinance authorized pursuant to Section 7284.2 or any
 other law is suspended, and the utility user tax rate to be applied instead during the period under any ordinance as so adopted is the applicable of the following:

(1) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of less than 1.5 percent, the rate shall be 0 percent.

(2) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 1.5 percent or more but less than 2.5 percent, the rate shall be 1.5 percent.

(3) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to
 impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 2.5 percent or more but less than 3.5 percent, the rate shall be 2.5 percent.

(4) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 3.5 percent or more but less than 4.5 percent, the rate shall be 3.5 percent.

(5) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 4.5 percent or more but less than 5.5 percent, the rate shall be 4.5 percent.

(6) In the case of
 a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 5.5 percent or more but less than 6.5 percent, the rate shall be 5.5 percent.

(7) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 6.5 percent or more but less than 7.5 percent, the rate shall be 6.5 percent.

(8) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 7.5 percent or more but less than 9 percent, the rate shall be 7.5 percent.

(9) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid communication services in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of 9 percent or more, the rate shall be 9 percent.

(b) Subdivision (a) is a self-executing provision that operates without regard to any decision or act on the part of any city, county, or city and county. A change in a utility user tax rate resulting from either the suspension of, or the termination of the suspension of, a utility user rate adopted by a city, county, or city and county set forth in subdivision (a) is not subject to voter approval under either statute or Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a city, county, or city and county may levy,
 increase, or extend a utility user tax at any rate on the consumption of communication services, including a utility user tax on the consumption of prepaid mobile telephony service, except that during the period on and after January 1, 2016, any utility user tax rate on prepaid mobile telephony service under any ordinance as so adopted shall be the applicable rate specified in subdivision (a).

(d) On and after January 1, 2016, this part shall be all of the following:

(1) The exclusive method for both of the following:

(A) Collecting the local utility user taxes, local 911 charges, and any other local charges imposed on consumers using prepaid mobile telephony services.

(B) Defining the scope of the tax or charge with respect to prepaid mobile telephony
 services.

(2) For the taxation of prepaid mobile telephony services only, the complete substitute for the utility user tax rate set out in the local ordinance with the applicable tiered rate as established by the Legislature.

(3) This part shall not preempt, limit, or affect the general authority of local jurisdictions to impose a utility user tax, local 911 charge, or any other local charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 885, Sec. 9.   (AB 1717)   Effective September 30, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42102.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after January 1, 2016, the authority of a city, county, or city and county, which includes a charter city, county, or city and county, to impose a charge, that applies to prepaid mobile telephony service, for access to communication services or access to local “911” emergency telephone systems in the city, county, or city and county at the
 rate as specified in an ordinance is suspended, and the rate to be applied instead during that period under any ordinance as so adopted is the applicable of the following:

(1) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a charge that applies to prepaid mobile telephony service for access to communication services or access to local “911” emergency telephone systems in the city, county, or city and county at the rate of less than one dollar ($1) per month per access line, including any adjustments for inflation, the rate shall be 0 percent.

(2) In the case of a city, county, or city and county that has adopted an ordinance to impose a charge that applies to prepaid mobile telephony service for access to communication services or access to local “911” emergency telephone systems in the city, county, or city and county at a specified
 percentage or at the rate of one dollar ($1) per month per access line, including any adjustments for inflation, or more, the rate shall be the specified percentage or the rate obtained by dividing the dollar amount by 50, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent.

(b) Subdivision (a) is a self-executing provision that operates without regard to any decision or act on the part of any city, county, or city and county. A change in an access charge rate resulting from either the suspension of, or the termination of the suspension of, a charge adopted by a city, county, or city and county set forth in subdivision (a) is not subject to voter approval under either statute or Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a city, county, or city and county may levy, increase, or extend a charge at any rate, that applies to prepaid mobile telephony
 services, for access to communication services or access to local “911” emergency telephone systems in the city, county, or city and county, except that during the period on and after January 1, 2016, any charge on prepaid mobile telephony service under any ordinance as so adopted shall be the applicable rate specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 885, Sec. 9.   (AB 1717)   Effective September 30, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42103.

(a) (1) The department shall perform all functions incident to the collection of the local charges of a local jurisdiction or local agency and shall collect and administer the local charges pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)) in the manner prescribed by this part, subject to the limitations set forth in Section 42105. For purposes of this part, the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the local charges imposed by this part, and references to “feepayer” shall include a person required to pay the local charges imposed by this part, which includes the sellers, who shall be required to register with the department.

(2) Notwithstanding Article 1.1 (commencing with
 Section 55050) of Chapter 3 of Part 30, any person required, or that elects, to remit amounts due under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) by electronic funds transfer pursuant to Article 1.2 (commencing with Section 6479.3) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 shall remit the local charges due under this section by electronic funds transfer.

(b) All local charges collected by the department shall be deposited in the Local Charges for Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and shall be held in trust for the local taxing jurisdiction, and shall not be used for any other purpose. Local charges shall consist of all taxes, charges, interest, penalties, and other amounts collected and paid to the department, less payments for refunds and reimbursement to the department for expenses incurred in the administration and collection of the local charges. The department shall transmit the funds to the local
 jurisdictions periodically as promptly as feasible. The transmittals required under this section shall be made at least once in each calendar quarter. The department shall furnish a quarterly statement indicating the amounts paid and withheld for expenses of the department incurred for the administration and collection of local charges.

(c) (1) The department shall prescribe and adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the administration and collection of local charges and the distribution of the local charges collected.

(2) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce any emergency regulations as necessary to implement this part. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(d) The department shall establish procedures to be used by a seller, including a direct seller, to document that a sale is not a retail transaction.

(e) The department’s audit duties under this part shall be limited to verification that the seller complied with this part.

(f) Subject to the confidentiality requirements of Sections 7284.6, 7284.7, and 19542, the department shall make available to a requesting local jurisdiction or local agency any information that is reasonably available to the department
 regarding the proper collection and remittance of a local charge of the local jurisdiction or local agency by a seller, including a direct seller.

(g) The department may contract with a third party for purposes of this part, solely in connection with the following department duties:

(1) To allocate and transmit collected local charges in the Local Charges for Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) to the appropriate local jurisdictions.

(2) To audit proper collection and remittance of the local charge pursuant to this part.

(3) To respond to requests from sellers, consumers, boards, and others regarding issues pertaining to local charges that are within the scope of the department’s duties.

(h) For purposes of this part, any third-party contract under subdivision (g) shall be subject to the following limitations:

(1) Any third party shall, to the same extent as the department, be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 55381, relating to unlawful disclosures.

(2) A third-party contract shall not provide, in whole or in part, in any manner a contingent fee arrangement as payment for services rendered. For purposes of this section, “contingent fee” includes, but is not limited to, a fee that is based on a percentage of the tax liability reported on a return, a fee that is based on a percentage of the taxes owed, or a fee that depends on the specific tax result attained.

(i) Except for those procedures established pursuant to subdivision (d) and
 the sharing of information pursuant to subdivision (f), this section does not apply to direct sellers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 8.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42103.1.

The department shall establish remittance schedules and methods for payment of the local charges that use existing methods established under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001)), including all of the following:

(a) The local charges, minus the amount retained by the seller pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42101.6, are due and payable to the department quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter.

(b) On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, a return for the preceding calendar quarter shall be filed using electronic media with the department.

(c) Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(d) This section applies only to those remittances of the local charges that are required to be remitted to the department pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 9.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42103.2.

Every seller, except a seller that is not required to collect the local charges pursuant to Section 42101.7, shall register with the department. Nothing in this section prevents a seller from registering with the department on a voluntary basis to collect and remit the charges even if the seller meets the de minimis sales threshold provided by Section 42101.7. The department shall establish a method for registration of sellers under this part that uses the existing registration process for a seller’s permit established pursuant to Section 6066 of the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001)). Every application for registration shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of its place or
 places of business, and any other information that the department may require. An application for registration shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 10.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42104.

(a) To provide adequate cashflow for expenses incurred by the board in the administration and collection of the local charges, the Director of Finance may approve a short-term loan in the 2015–16 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Local Charges for Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Fund.

(b) For the purposes of
 this section, a short-term loan is a transfer that is made subject to the following conditions:

(1) Any amount loaned is to be repaid in full during the same fiscal year in which the loan was made, except that the repayment may be delayed until a date not more than six months after the date of enactment of the annual Budget Act for the subsequent fiscal year.

(2) Loans shall be repaid whenever the funds are needed to meet cash expenditure needs in the loaning fund or account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 25, Sec. 56.   (SB 84)   Effective June 24, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42105.

(a) The local jurisdiction or local agency that has adopted an ordinance to impose a local charge that applies to prepaid mobile telephony service shall be solely responsible for:

(1) Defending any claim regarding the validity of the ordinance in its application to prepaid mobile telephony service.

(2) Interpreting any provision of the ordinance, except to the extent specifically superseded by this statute.

(3) Responding to any claim for refund by a consumer arising under subdivision (b), (c), or (d). The claim shall be processed in accordance with the provisions of the local enactment that allows the claim to be filed.

(4) Certifying that the local jurisdiction’s or local agency’s ordinance applies the local charge to prepaid mobile telephony services and agreeing to indemnify and hold harmless the department, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from collection of the local charge.

(5) Reallocation of local charges as a result of correcting errors relating to the location of the point of sale of a seller or the known address of a consumer, for up to two past quarters from the date of knowledge.

(6) Enforcement, including audits, of the collection and remittance of local charges by direct sellers pursuant to the local jurisdiction’s or local agency’s ordinance.

(b) A consumer may rebut the presumed location of the
 retail transaction to the city or county clerk of the local jurisdiction, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 42101.8 by filing a claim and declaration under penalty of perjury on a form established by the city or county clerk of the local jurisdiction or local agency indicating the actual location of the retail sale. The claim shall be processed in accordance with the provisions of the local enactment that allows the claim to be filed.

(c) A consumer that is exempt from the local charge under the local enactment may file a claim for a refund from the local jurisdiction or local agency in accordance with the refund provisions of the local enactment that allows the claim to be filed.

(d) In connection with any actions or claims relating to or arising from the invalidity of a local tax ordinance, in whole or in part, the seller shall not be liable to any consumer as a
 consequence of collecting the tax. In the event a local jurisdiction or local agency is ordered to refund the tax, it shall be the sole responsibility of the local jurisdiction or local agency to refund the tax. In any action seeking to enjoin collection of a local charge by a seller, in any action seeking declaratory relief concerning a local charge, in any action seeking a refund of a local charge, or in any action seeking to otherwise invalidate a local charge, the sole necessary party defendant in the action shall be the local jurisdiction or local agency on whose behalf the local charge is collected, and the seller collecting the local charge shall not be named as a party in the action. There shall be no recovery from the state for the imposition of any unconstitutional or otherwise invalid local charge that is collected pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 11.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42106.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Quarterly local charges” means the total amount of local charges transmitted by the department to a city, county, or city and county for a calendar quarter.

(2) “Refund” means the amount of local charges deducted by the department from a city’s, county’s, or city and county’s quarterly local charges in order to pay the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s share of a local charge refund due to one taxpayer.

(3) “Offset portion” means that portion of the refund that exceeds the greater of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or 20 percent of the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s quarterly local
 charges.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the department has deducted a refund from a city’s, county’s, or city and county’s quarterly local charges which includes an offset portion, then the following provisions apply:

(1) Within three months after the department has deducted an offset portion, the city, county, or city and county may request the department to transmit the offset portion to the city, county, or city and county.

(2) As promptly as feasible after the department receives the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s request, the department shall transmit to the city, county, or city and county the offset portion as part of the department’s periodic transmittal of local charges.

(3) The department shall thereafter deduct a pro
 rata share of the offset portion from future transmittals of local charges to the city, county, or city and county over a period to be determined by the department, but not less than two calendar quarters and not more than eight calendar quarters, until the entire amount of the offset portion has been deducted.

(c) The department shall not transmit the offset portion of the refund to the city, county, or city and county if that transmittal would reduce or delay either the department’s payment of the refund to the taxpayer or the department’s periodic transmittals of local charges to other cities, counties, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 12.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42107.

A local jurisdiction or local agency shall pay to the department its pro rata share of the department’s cost of collection and administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 13.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42109.

The department shall annually prepare a report showing the amount of both reimbursed and unreimbursed costs incurred by it in administering the collection of local charges pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 14.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42110.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 55381, it is unlawful for any person, other than an officer or employee of a county, city and county, city, or district, who obtains access to information contained in, or derived from, local charge records of the department pursuant to subdivision (b), to retain that information after that person’s contract with the county, city and county, city, or district has expired.

(b) (1) When requested by resolution of the legislative body of any county, city and county, city, or district, the department shall permit any duly authorized officer or employee of the county, city and county, city, or district, or other person designated by that resolution, to examine all of the local charge records of the department pertaining
 to the ascertainment of those local charges to be collected for the county, city and county, city, or district by the department pursuant to contract entered into between the department and the county, city and county, city, or district pursuant to this part. Except as otherwise provided in this section, this subdivision does not allow any officer, employee, or other person authorized or designated by a county, city and county, city, or district to examine any sales or transactions and use tax records of any taxpayer. The costs that are incurred by the department in complying with a request made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted by the department from those revenues collected by the department on behalf of the county, city and county, city, or district making the request.

(2) The resolution of the legislative body of the county, city and county, city, or district shall certify that any person designated by the resolution, other
 than an officer or employee, meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Has an existing contract with the county, city and county, city, or district to examine those local charge records.

(B) Is required by that contract to disclose information contained in, or derived from, those local charge records only to an officer or employee of the county, city and county, city, or district who is authorized by the resolution to examine the information.

(C) Is prohibited by that contract from performing consulting services for a seller during the term of that contract.

(D) Is prohibited by that contract from retaining the information contained in, or derived from, those local charge records, after that contract has expired.

(3) Information obtained by examination of department records pursuant to this subdivision shall be used only for purposes related to the collection of the local charges by the department pursuant to the contract, or for purposes related to other governmental functions of the county, city and county, city, or district set forth in the resolution.

(c) If the department believes that any information obtained pursuant to subdivision (b) has been disclosed to any person not authorized or designated by the resolution of the legislative body of the county, city and county, city, or district, or has been used for purposes not permitted by subdivision (b), the department may impose conditions on access to its local charge records that the department considers reasonable, in order to protect the confidentiality of those records.

(d) Predecessors, successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information as to the items included in the measure and amounts of any unpaid local charges or amounts of local charges required to be collected, interest, and penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 15.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42111.

This part shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 553, Sec. 1.   (AB 330)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 21.1, commencing with Section 42100.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 22. HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES TAX LAW [43001. - 43651.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [43001. - 43013.]

43001.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Hazardous Substances Tax Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43002.

The collection and administration of the fees and taxes imposed by Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of, the Health and Safety Code, respectively, shall be governed by the definitions in those provisions, unless expressly superseded by the definitions contained in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 123.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

43002.3.

(a) For purposes of the collection of the fees specified in subdivision (a) of Section 25174 of the Health and Safety Code, a determination by the Department of Toxic Substances Control that a waste is nonhazardous shall be effective only for wastes generated and handled commencing with the month during which the Department of Toxic Substances Control receives a completed application for that determination.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022, and shall apply to the fees due after the June 2022 reporting period, including the prepayments due following the reporting period and the fee due and payable following the reporting period.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 82) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 73, Sec. 83.   (SB 158)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

43003.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.
